Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201844-8507
Violations; director; powers; administrative
fine.

If
a vendor violates any provision of the Portable Electronics Insurance Act,
the director may, after notice and a hearing:

(1) Revoke
or suspend a limited lines insurance license issued under the act;

(2) Impose
such other penalties, including suspension of the transaction of insurance
at specific vendor locations where violations have occurred, as the director
deems necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of the act; and

(3) Impose
an administrative fine of not more than one thousand dollars per violation
or five thousand dollars in the aggregate.

Laws 2011, LB535, § 7.